District of Columbia statutes.
4-753.07

Local rent supplement program referrals.

Notwithstanding § 4-753.05, during Fiscal Year 2015, the District of Columbia Housing Authority shall fill 75 tenant-based Rent Supplement Program vouchers, established by § 6-228, through referrals by the Department of Human Services. The referrals shall be based on special eligibility criteria established in 29 DCMR § 2557.1 , or shall consist of families currently in the Department of Human Services Permanent Supportive Housing Program who the Department determines no longer need intensive services.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 8d [8e]
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5162, 61 DCR 9990; renumbered 8e
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5172 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5162 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5162 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).